Utah statutes.
20A-2-102.5.   Voter registration deadline.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 20A-2-201 and in Title 20A, Chapter 3, Part 4, Voting by Members of the Military and by Other Persons Living or Serving Abroad, a person who fails to submit a correctly completed voter registration form on or before the voter registration deadline shall not be permitted to vote in the election.

(2)  The voter registration deadline shall be the date that is 30 calendar days before the date of the election.

